Illinois, session 104th, SB1786.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Reverend 5Jesse Jackson, Sr. Young Voter Empowerment Law.  6    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 710-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 8    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)9    Sec. 10-20.88. High school voter registration. Beginning 10with the 2025-2026 school year, a school district maintaining 11any of grades 9 through 12 shall provide all eligible students 12graduating from high school with the opportunity to register 13to vote. 14    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)15    Sec. 34-18.88. High school voter registration. Beginning 16with the 2025-2026 school year, the school district shall 17provide all eligible students graduating from high school with 18the opportunity to register to vote. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.